New York, session 2025-2026, A3211.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 4 of section 911 of the execu- 2 tive law, as separately amended by chapters 382 and 397 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (c) the state's major creeks comprised of the 18 Mile Creek located in 5 Erie county, Chittenango Creek, Bash Bish and Kinderhook Creek located 6 in Columbia county, Kinderhook Creek located in Rensselaer county, Bash- 7 er Kill, Bushkill, Cattaraugus, Cayadutta, North Chuctanunda, Cincinna- 8 ti, East Kill, Esopus (including upper and lower branches), Falls Brook 9 in Essex county, Ferguson, Fish (including east and west branches), 10 Gooseberry, Great Valley, Jones Brook in Essex county, Kelso Brook in 11 Essex county, Kennyetto, Little Sandy, Minerva Stream in Essex county, 12 Moyer, Mud Creek located in Oneida county, Ninemile Creek, Onondaga, 13 Oriskany, Peekskill Hollow, Reall, Roeliff Jansen Kill, Rondout, Sandy, 14 Sauquoit, Schoharie, Shawangunk Kill, Six Mile Creek, South Sandy, 15 Oatka, Tonawanda, Trout Brook in Essex county, West Kill, Scajaquada, 16 Wappinger, Webatuck, Wassaic, Willsey in the village of Wurtsboro, Wood 17 Creek located in Herkimer county, Wood Creek located in Oneida county, 18 Black Creek located in Monroe county, Black Creek located in Genesee and 19 Wyoming counties, Ellicott Creek located in Erie county, Wynantskill, 20 Claverack, Taghkanic, Agawamuck, Wyomanock, and Ley Creek and Butternut 21 Creek located in Onondaga county, Nanticoke and Sawkill (in Ulster coun- 22 ty), Saw Kill and Fall Kill located in Dutchess county, Otter Kill Creek 23 located in Orange county, Black Meadow Creek located in Orange county, 24 and the Silver Lake Outlet located in Wyoming county; 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04902-01-5